Arkansas, session 2025, SB419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Cultivation facility.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cultivation facility" means the same as defined in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98, § 2;
(2)(A) "Finished goods packaging" means product packaging for
usable marijuana that:
(i) Is received by a qualifying patient;
(ii) Is child resistant or contains a child-
resistant container; and
(iii) Has product information that is directly
printed on the packaging of the finished product or has an attached label or
leaflet that contains product information.
(B) "Finished goods packaging" includes without limitation
a label attached to the product packaging;
*CEB014*
03/10/2025 3:28:11 PM CEB014

SB419
(3) "Medical use" means the same as defined in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98, § 2;
(4) "Qualifying patient" means the same as defined in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98, § 2;
(5) "Usable marijuana" means the same as defined in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98, § 2; and
(6) "Utility" means electricity, liquefied petroleum gas,
natural gas, and water.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of the
following to a cultivation facility are exempt from the gross receipts tax
levied by this chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) Seeds used in the cultivation and production of usable
marijuana;
(2)(A) New and used equipment, machinery, and related
attachments used exclusively in the cultivation and production of usable
marijuana.
(B) The exemption provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
this section does not apply to a purchase of a repair or replacement part for
new or used machinery, equipment, or a related attachment;
(3)(A) A utility that is used exclusively in the operation of
the cultivation facility.
(B)(i) A utility subject to the exemption provided under
subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be separately metered from a
utility used for any other purpose by the taxpayer.
(ii) However, the rules promulgated under subsection
(c) of this section may establish additional or alternate requirements for
the metering of utilities under this section.
(iii) Before allowing the exemption of a utility
under this section, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may require a seller of a utility to obtain a certificate from
the taxpayer in the form prescribed by the secretary, certifying that the
taxpayer is eligible for the exemption under this section;
(4) Consumable materials, ingredients, and chemicals used in the
cultivation, extraction, or manufacturing of marijuana for medical use;
(5) Finished goods packaging; and
03/10/2025 3:28:11 PM CEB014

SB419
(6) A device that is used to house usable marijuana that is
placed in finished goods packaging, including without limitation a syringe,
concentrate container, suppository mold, topical pump, and cartridge.
(c) The secretary shall promulgate rules for the proper administration
of this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.




























03/10/2025 3:28:11 PM CEB014